Massachusetts, session 194th, H4317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Dennis Ragazzini, a member
of the state employees’ retirement system, with 10 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between December 28, 1993
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Dennis Ragazzini to the state employees’ retirement
system of an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from
his regular compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or
installments, as the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Scott Chicoine, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 8.24 years of creditable service for his employment
of 6

with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between July 2, 2000 and
September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section shall
be conditioned upon payment by Scott Chicoine to the state employees’ retirement system of an
amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Schaun Dion, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 6.93 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between October 22, 2001
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Schaun Dion to the state employees’ retirement system of
an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Eric Weston, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 6.44 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between April 21, 2002 and
September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section shall
be conditioned upon payment by Eric Weston to the state employees’ retirement system of an
amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
of 6

compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Jason Orlowski, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 5.67 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between January 27, 2003
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Jason Orlowski to the state employees’ retirement system
of an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his
regular compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or
installments, as the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Thomas Stark, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 3.99 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between October 3, 2004
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Thomas Stark to the state employees’ retirement system of
an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Joshua Child, a member of
of 6

the state employees’ retirement system, with 3.72 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between January 9, 2005
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Joshua Child to the state employees’ retirement system of
an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Darren Begley, a member of
the MASSACHUSETTS STATE RETIREMENT (MSRB) retirement system, with 2.33 years of
creditable service for his employment with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National
Guard Base between May 30, 2006 and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for
creditable service pursuant to this section shall be conditioned upon payment by Darren Begley
to the MASSACHUSETTS STATE RETIREMENT (MSRB) county retirement system of an
amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Bernard Devin, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 1.72 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between January 9, 2007
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Bernard Devin to the state employees’ retirement system
of 6

of an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his
regular compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or
installments, as the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Kyle Davis, a member of the
state employees’ retirement system, with 1.17 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between July 28, 2007 and
September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section shall
be conditioned upon payment by Kyle Davis to the state employees’ retirement system of an
amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Kyle McHale, a member of
the state employees’ retirement system, with 1.11 years of creditable service for his employment
with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between August 20. 2007
and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
shall be conditioned upon payment by Kyle McHale to the state employees’ retirement system of
an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular
compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or installments, as
100 the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
of 6

101 SECTION 12. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
102 special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Michael Ayotte, a member
103 of the state employees’ retirement system, with 10 years of creditable service for his employment
104 with the federal fire department at the Otis Air National Guard Base between October 1, 1986
105 and September 28, 2008; provided, that eligibility for creditable service pursuant to this section
106 shall be conditioned upon payment by Michael Ayotte to the state employees’ retirement system
107 of an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his
108 regular compensation for such previous service plus buyback interest, in 1 lump sum or
109 installments, as the state board of retirement shall prescribe.
of 6